Louisiana, session 2026, HB613.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:410(A)(3)(a)(x) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§410. Form of license; photograph, signature of licensee, anatomical gift statement,
declaration of life-sustaining procedures, and additional information on
license
A.
* * *
(3)(a) Every license issued shall bear thereon:
* * *
(x) An image of an eagle in flight to signify that the applicant is a citizen of
the United States, provided that the applicant's citizenship has been verified. If the
system of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles,
is currently unable to accommodate the inclusion of new credentials, any future
system upgrade or new card implementation shall include the capability to comply
with the requirements of this Item.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 613 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 40:1321(E)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1321. State identification cards; special identification cards; issuance; veteran
designation; special needs or accommodation designations; fees; expiration
and renewal; exceptions; promulgation of rules; promotion of use; persons
less than twenty-one years of age; the Protect and Save our Children
Program; Selective Service Registration
* * *
E.
* * *
(3)(a) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall display an image of an eagle in flight on any special identification
card issued to signify that the applicant is a citizen of the United States, provided that
the applicant’s citizenship has been verified.
(b) If the system of the office of motor vehicles is currently unable to
accommodate the inclusion of new credentials, any future system upgrade or new
card implementation shall include the capability to comply with the requirements of
this Paragraph.
Section 3. The office of motor vehicles shall promulgate rules in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Act, including rules
governing the design, placement, and format of the citizenship indicator and acceptable
documentation for verifying United States citizenship.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.